Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 5011.
Duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as designers;

receive applications for licensure, administer or approve examinations, and provide licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer; and

explain appeal procedures to licensed designers and to applicants, and complaint procedures to the public.

The Director shall adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section after due consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources. These rules may establish grades, types, classes, or subcategories of licenses corresponding to prescribed scopes of practice.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5012.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint three persons to be advisors to the Secretary, two of which shall be designers licensed under this chapter and one of which shall be a representative of the Agency of Natural Resources. Advisors shall be appointed for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to design. Two of the initial appointments may be for a term of fewer than five years.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint three persons to be advisors to the Secretary, two of which shall be designers licensed under this chapter and one of which shall be a representative of the Agency of Natural Resources. Advisors shall be appointed for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to design. Two of the initial appointments may be for a term of fewer than five years.

A designer appointee shall have not fewer than five years’ experience as a licensed designer immediately preceding appointment; shall be licensed as a designer in Vermont; and shall be actively engaged in the practice of design in this State during incumbency.

The Agency of Natural Resources appointee shall be involved in the permitting program established under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.